Wisconsin, session 2025, AB622.
do enact as follows:AB622,11Section 1. 108.04 (7) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB622,3,22108.04 (7) (e) Paragraph (a) does not apply if the department determines that 3the employee accepted work that the employee could have failed to accept under sub. 4(8) and terminated the work on the same grounds and within the first 30 calendar 5days 10 weeks after starting the work, or that the employee accepted work that the 6employee could have refused under sub. (9) and terminated the work within the 7first 30 calendar days 10 weeks after starting the work. For purposes of this 8paragraph, an employee has the same grounds for voluntarily terminating work if 9the employee could have failed to accept the work under sub. (8) (d) to (em) when it 1was offered, regardless of the reason articulated by the employee for the 2termination.AB622,23Section 2. 108.04 (7) (t) 1. of the statutes is repealed.AB622,34Section 3. 108.04 (7) (t) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB622,3,75108.04 (7) (t) 2. The employee’s spouse was required by the U.S. armed forces 6his or her employing unit to relocate to a place to which it is impractical for the 7employee to commute.AB622,48Section 4. 108.04 (8) (d) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB622,3,119108.04 (8) (d) (intro.) With respect to the first 6 10 weeks after the employee 10became unemployed, “suitable work,” for purposes of par. (a), means work to which 11all of the following apply:AB622,512Section 5. 108.04 (8) (dm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB622,3,1813108.04 (8) (dm) With respect to the 7th 11th week after the employee became 14unemployed and any week thereafter, “suitable work,” for purposes of par. (a), 15means any work that the employee is capable of performing, regardless of whether 16the employee has any relevant experience or training, that pays wages that are 17above the lowest quartile of wages for similar work in the labor market area in 18which the work is located, as determined by the department.AB622,619Section 6. Initial applicability.AB622,3,2120(1) The treatment of s. 108.04 (7) (t) 1. and 2. first applies to determinations 21issued under s. 108.09 on the effective date of this subsection.AB622,3,2322(2) The treatment of s. 108.04 (7) (e) first applies to determinations issued 23under s. 108.09 on the effective date of this subsection.AB622,4,21(3) The treatment of s. 108.04 (8) (d) (intro.) and (dm) first applies to 2determinations issued under s. 108.09 on the effective date of this subsection.AB622,73Section 7. Effective date.AB622,4,54(1) This act takes effect on the first Sunday of the 2nd month beginning after 5publication.AB622,4,66